Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-216
Premises, defined.

Premises shall mean a building, a distinct portion of a building, or a railroad coach car of an excursion or dinner train in which bingo is being played and shall not include any area of land surrounding the building or excursion or dinner train.

No premises shall be subdivided to provide multiple premises where games of bingo are managed, operated, or conducted whether or not such premises have different mailing addresses or legal descriptions.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 9-135;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 17;

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 9.